Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-806
Nebraska State Patrol; provide information
to law enforcement agencies.

The Nebraska State Patrol shall provide the information
collected pursuant to section 86-805 to all law enforcement agencies in this
state on a quarterly basis or as soon as practicable if a change in such information
has occurred.

Laws 2010, LB735, § 6.